New York, session 2025-2026, S1953.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 9 to read as follows: 3 § 9. Joint report. (a) Beginning June first, two thousand twenty-six, 4 the department of audit and control and the authorities budget office 5 shall formulate an annual joint report on the financial and operational 6 practices of any state authority whose purpose is to operate commuter 7 transportation within the metropolitan commuter transportation district. 8 Such report shall include a review of such practices and recommendations 9 for improvement of operations with the goal of making services more 10 efficient and cost effective. No later than December thirty-first, two 11 thousand twenty-six, such report shall be completed and submitted to the 12 governor, the speaker of the assembly, the assembly minority leader, the 13 temporary president of the senate, the senate minority leader, and any 14 state authorities which are subjects of the report. 15 (b) Any authority who is a subject of a report shall submit all docu- 16 ments requested by the department of audit and control or the authori- 17 ties budget office within thirty days from such request. 18 (c) Upon completion of the report, the head of the public authority 19 which the letter or report was about, shall submit a written response 20 acknowledging receipt of the letter or report within thirty days of the 21 receipt of the report. If the report created by the department of audit 22 and control and the authorities budget office makes recommendations for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03491-01-5 S. 1953 2 1 corrective action, such head of the public authority shall issue a writ- 2 ten report within one hundred eighty days after receipt thereof to the 3 department of audit and control, the authorities budget office, the 4 governor, the speaker of the assembly, the assembly minority leader, the 5 temporary president of the senate, and the senate minority leader, 6 containing which steps were taken to implement such recommendations, 7 and, where recommendations were not implemented, the reasons therefor. 8 Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall make the 9 authority delinquent in its reporting requirements. 10 (d) Upon receipt of the head of the authority's response to the 11 report, the governor shall make a written determination within sixty 12 days as to whether any recommendations for corrective action not taken 13 by the authority should be implemented by the authority and issue an 14 order for them to do so. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.